Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-1971
Election, designation, and appointment of directors.

(a) If the corporation has members, all the directors (except the initial directors) shall be elected at the first annual meeting of members, and at each annual meeting thereafter, unless the articles or bylaws provide some other time or method of election or provide that some of the directors are appointed by some other person or designated.

(b) If the corporation does not have members, all the directors (except the initial directors) shall be elected, appointed, or designated as provided in the articles or bylaws. If no method of designation or appointment is set forth in the articles or bylaws, the directors (other than the initial directors) shall be elected by the board.

Laws 1996, LB 681, § 71.